Vermont statutes. Title 20 Internal Security and Public Safety
Subchapter 2. Federal Service

§ 641.
When and by whom called out.

Upon the request of the President of the United States, and in case of war or invasion, or to prevent insurrection or invasion, the Governor may call out as many of the Vermont National Guard as the circumstances require. The National Guard, when ordered to prepare for actual service, shall be administered and trained according to the laws of this State and of the United States. On the termination of the emergency, all persons discharged from the military service who were, upon draft into federal service, members of the Vermont National Guard shall resume their membership in the Vermont National Guard, and shall continue to serve in the Vermont National Guard until the dates upon which their enlistments prior to their draft would have expired if uninterrupted.

HISTORY:

Amended

1973, No. 223

(Adj. Sess.), § 9, eff. April 4, 1974;

2021, No. 10

, § 34.

§ 642.
Failure to report.

Each officer, noncommissioned officer, and enlisted person ordered out, and every volunteer or drafted person, who fails to appear at the time and place designated, without rendering a sufficient excuse for the failure, shall be dealt with as provided by the laws of the United States in like cases.

HISTORY:

Amended

2021, No. 10

, § 35.

§ 643.
Repealed. 2021, No. 10, § 36.

§ 644.
Repealed.
1973, No. 223 (Adj. Sess.), § 17, eff. April 4, 1974.

§ 645.
Repealed. 2021, No. 10, § 37.